dix/apertium-eo-fr.eo-crossed.dix
    <pardef n="nom__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nomf__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ino__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oj</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ino</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inoj</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>on</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ojn</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inon</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inojn</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="la__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mia__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dem__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ambaŭ__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ind__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quant__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="ajna">
        <i>ajna</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="akciulo">
        <i>akciul</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="alia">
        <i>alia</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ambaŭ">
        <i>ambaŭ</i> 
        <par n="ambaŭ__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="anaso">
        <i>anas</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="arbitraciisto">
        <i>arbitraciist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="arĥivisto">
        <i>arĥivist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="atestanto">
        <i>atestant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="barbaro">
        <i>barbar</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="biologo">
        <i>biolog</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="certa">
        <i>certa</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="demokrato">
        <i>demokrat</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="diablo">
        <i>diabl</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="diversa">
        <i>diversa</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="egipta">
        <i>egipt</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="elimini">
        <i>elimini</i> 
        <par n="nom__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="emiro">
        <i>emir</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="eŭropano">
        <i>eŭropan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fiŝisto">
        <i>fiŝist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fumanto">
        <i>fumant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="gejo">
        <i>gej</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="gvidinstruisto">
        <i>gvidinstruist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="humuristo">
        <i>humurist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ilia">
        <i>ilia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="indiĝeno">
        <i>indiĝen</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="interpretisto">
        <i>interpretist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="israelano">
        <i>israelan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="iu">
        <i>iu</i> 
        <par n="quant__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="juĝisto">
        <i>juĝist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kasisto">
        <i>kasist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kleriko">
        <i>klerik</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kompano">
        <i>kompan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="konsumanto">
        <i>konsumant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kuniklo">
        <i>kunikl</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="la">
        <i>la</i> 
        <par n="la__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="lernejano">
        <i>lernejan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="lia">
        <i>lia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="loĝanto">
        <i>loĝant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malamiko">
        <i>malamik</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malmulta">
        <i>malmulta</i> 
        <par n="quant__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="marsano">
        <i>marsan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="membro">
        <i>membr</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mia">
        <i>mia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ministro">
        <i>ministr</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="naciisto">
        <i>naciist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="nederlandano">
        <i>nederlandan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="neniu">
        <i>neniu</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="nia">
        <i>nia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="oficisto">
        <i>oficist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="palestinano">
        <i>palestinan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="patro">
        <i>patr</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="perdanto">
        <i>perdant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pioniro">
        <i>pionir</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pordisto">
        <i>pordist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="produktoro">
        <i>produktor</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="reprezentanto">
        <i>reprezentant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="serĝento">
        <i>serĝent</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="subulo">
        <i>subul</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tia">
        <i>tia</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tiu">
        <i>tiu</i> 
        <par n="dem__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="urso">
        <i>urs</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="via">
        <i>via</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="vojaĝanto">
        <i>vojaĝant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉiu">
        <i>ĉiu</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉiu">
        <i>ĉiu</i> 
        <par n="quant__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĝia">
        <i>ĝia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ŝia">
        <i>ŝia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ŝoforo">
        <i>ŝofor</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
